csv2yaml/yaml_output/VTI_i.yaml
     miijin+VTI+Imp+NA+Del+2Sg+0Sg/0Pl: miijiikan
     miijin+VTI+Imp+NA+Del+2Pl+0Sg/0Pl: miijiikeg
     miijin+VTI+Imp+NA+Del+Incl+0Sg/0Pl: miijiikang
     miijin+VTI+Imp+NA+Prb+2Sg+0Sg/0Pl: miijiken
     miijin+VTI+Imp+NA+Prb+2Pl+0Sg/0Pl: miijikegon
     miijin+VTI+Imp+NA+Prb+Incl+0Sg: miijisiidaa
     miijin+VTI+Imp+NA+Prb+Incl+0Pl: miijisiidaanin
     miijin+VTI+Imp+NA+Sim+2Sg+0Sg/0Pl: miijin
     miijin+VTI+Imp+NA+Sim+2Pl+0Sg/0Pl: [miijig,miijik]
     miijin+VTI+Imp+NA+Sim+Incl+0Sg: miijidaa
     miijin+VTI+Imp+NA+Sim+Incl+0Pl: miijidaanin
     miijin+VTI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+1Sg+0Sg/0Pl: miijisiiwaanen
     miijin+VTI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+2Pl+0Sg/0Pl: miijisiiwegwen
     miijin+VTI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+2Sg+0Sg/0Pl: miijisiiwanen
     miijin+VTI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+3PlProx+0Sg/0Pl: miijisiiwaagwen
     miijin+VTI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+3SgObv/3PlObv+0Sg/0Pl: miijisiinigwen
     miijin+VTI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+3SgProx+0Sg/0Pl: miijisiigwen
     miijin+VTI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+Excl+0Sg/0Pl: miijisiiwaangen
     miijin+VTI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+Incl+0Sg/0Pl: miijisiiwangen
     miijin+VTI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+X+0Sg/0Pl: miijisiiwiingen
     miijin+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+1Sg+0Sg/0Pl: miijiwaanen
     miijin+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+2Pl+0Sg/0Pl: miijiwegwen
     miijin+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+2Sg+0Sg/0Pl: miijiwanen
     miijin+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+3PlProx+0Sg/0Pl: miijiwaagwen
     miijin+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+3SgObv/3PlObv+0Sg/0Pl: miijinigwen
     miijin+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+3SgProx+0Sg/0Pl: miijigwen
     miijin+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+Excl+0Sg/0Pl: miijiwaangen
     miijin+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+Incl+0Sg/0Pl: miijiwangen
     miijin+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+X+0Sg/0Pl: miijiwiingen
     miijin+VTI+Cnj+Neg+DubPrt+1Sg+0Sg/0Pl: miijisiiwaambaanen
     miijin+VTI+Cnj+Neg+DubPrt+2Pl+0Sg/0Pl: [miijisiiwegibanen,miijisiiwegobanen]
     miijin+VTI+Cnj+Neg+DubPrt+2Sg+0Sg/0Pl: miijisiiwambanen
     miijin+VTI+Cnj+Neg+DubPrt+3PlProx+0Sg/0Pl: miijisiiwaagobanen
     miijin+VTI+Cnj+Neg+DubPrt+3SgObv/3PlObv+0Sg/0Pl: miijisiinigobanen
     miijin+VTI+Cnj+Neg+DubPrt+3SgProx+0Sg/0Pl: miijisiigobanen
     miijin+VTI+Cnj+Neg+DubPrt+Excl+0Sg/0Pl: miijisiiwaangibanen
     miijin+VTI+Cnj+Neg+DubPrt+Incl+0Sg/0Pl: miijisiiwangibanen
     miijin+VTI+Cnj+Neg+DubPrt+X+0Sg/0Pl: miijisiiwiingibanen
     miijin+VTI+Cnj+Pos+DubPrt+1Sg+0Sg/0Pl: miijiwaambaanen
     miijin+VTI+Cnj+Pos+DubPrt+2Pl+0Sg/0Pl: [miijiwegibanen,miijiwegobanen]
     miijin+VTI+Cnj+Pos+DubPrt+2Sg+0Sg/0Pl: miijiwambanen
     miijin+VTI+Cnj+Pos+DubPrt+3PlProx+0Sg/0Pl: miijiwaagobanen
     miijin+VTI+Cnj+Pos+DubPrt+3SgObv/3PlObv+0Sg/0Pl: miijinigobanen
     miijin+VTI+Cnj+Pos+DubPrt+3SgProx+0Sg/0Pl: miijigobanen
     miijin+VTI+Cnj+Pos+DubPrt+Excl+0Sg/0Pl: miijiwaangibanen
     miijin+VTI+Cnj+Pos+DubPrt+Incl+0Sg/0Pl: miijiwangibanen
     miijin+VTI+Cnj+Pos+DubPrt+X+0Sg/0Pl: miijiwiingibanen
     miijin+VTI+Cnj+Neg+Neu+1Sg+0Sg/0Pl: miijisiwaan
     miijin+VTI+Cnj+Neg+Neu+2Pl+0Sg/0Pl: miijisiweg
     miijin+VTI+Cnj+Neg+Neu+2Sg+0Sg/0Pl: miijisiwan
     miijin+VTI+Cnj+Neg+Neu+3PlProx+0Sg/0Pl: miijisigwaa
     miijin+VTI+Cnj+Neg+Neu+3SgObv/3PlObv+0Sg/0Pl: miijisinig
     miijin+VTI+Cnj+Neg+Neu+3SgProx+0Sg/0Pl: miijisig
     miijin+VTI+Cnj+Neg+Neu+Excl+0Sg/0Pl: miijisiwaang
     miijin+VTI+Cnj+Neg+Neu+Incl+0Sg/0Pl: miijisiwang
     miijin+VTI+Cnj+Neg+Neu+X+0Sg/0Pl: miijising
     miijin+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0Sg/0Pl: miijiyaan
     miijin+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+2Pl+0Sg/0Pl: miijiyeg
     miijin+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+2Sg+0Sg/0Pl: miijiyan
     miijin+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3PlProx+0Sg/0Pl: miijiwaad
     miijin+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3SgObv/3PlObv+0Sg/0Pl: miijinid
     miijin+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3SgProx+0Sg/0Pl: miijid
     miijin+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+Excl+0Sg/0Pl: miijiyaang
     miijin+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+Incl+0Sg/0Pl: miijiyang
     miijin+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+X+0Sg/0Pl: miijing
     miijin+VTI+Cnj+Neg+Prt+1Sg+0Sg/0Pl: miijisiwaambaan
     miijin+VTI+Cnj+Neg+Prt+2Pl+0Sg/0Pl: [miijisiwegiban,miijisiwegoban]
     miijin+VTI+Cnj+Neg+Prt+2Sg+0Sg/0Pl: miijisiwamban
     miijin+VTI+Cnj+Neg+Prt+3PlProx+0Sg/0Pl: miijisigwaaban
     miijin+VTI+Cnj+Neg+Prt+3SgObv/3PlObv+0Sg/0Pl: miijisinigoban
     miijin+VTI+Cnj+Neg+Prt+3SgProx+0Sg/0Pl: miijisigoban
     miijin+VTI+Cnj+Neg+Prt+Excl+0Sg/0Pl: miijisiwaangiban
     miijin+VTI+Cnj+Neg+Prt+Incl+0Sg/0Pl: miijisiwangiban
     miijin+VTI+Cnj+Neg+Prt+X+0Sg/0Pl: miijisingiban
     miijin+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+1Sg+0Sg/0Pl: miijiyaambaan
     miijin+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+2Pl+0Sg/0Pl: [miijiyegiban,miijiyegoban]
     miijin+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+2Sg+0Sg/0Pl: miijiyamban
     miijin+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+3PlProx+0Sg/0Pl: miijiwaapan
     miijin+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+3SgObv/3PlObv+0Sg/0Pl: miijinipan
     miijin+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+3SgProx+0Sg/0Pl: miijipan
     miijin+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+Excl+0Sg/0Pl: miijiyaangiban
     miijin+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+Incl+0Sg/0Pl: miijiyangiban
     miijin+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+X+0Sg/0Pl: miijingiban
     miijin+VTI+Ind+Neg+Dub+1Sg+0Pl: nimiijisiinaadogenan
     miijin+VTI+Ind+Neg+Dub+1Sg+0Sg: nimiijisiinaadog
     miijin+VTI+Ind+Neg+Dub+2Pl+0Pl: gimiijisiinaawaadogenan
     miijin+VTI+Ind+Neg+Dub+2Pl+0Sg: gimiijisiinaawaadog
     miijin+VTI+Ind+Neg+Dub+2Sg+0Pl: gimiijisiinaadogenan
     miijin+VTI+Ind+Neg+Dub+2Sg+0Sg: gimiijisiinaadog
     miijin+VTI+Ind+Neg+Dub+3PlProx+0Pl: omiijisiinaawaadogenan
     miijin+VTI+Ind+Neg+Dub+3PlProx+0Sg: omiijisiinaawaadog
     miijin+VTI+Ind+Neg+Dub+3SgObv/3PlObv+0Pl: omiijisiininaadogenan
     miijin+VTI+Ind+Neg+Dub+3SgObv/3PlObv+0Sg: omiijisiininaadog
     miijin+VTI+Ind+Neg+Dub+3SgProx+0Pl: omiijisiinaadogenan
     miijin+VTI+Ind+Neg+Dub+3SgProx+0Sg: omiijisiinaadog
     miijin+VTI+Ind+Neg+Dub+Excl+0Pl: nimiijisiiminaadogenan
     miijin+VTI+Ind+Neg+Dub+Excl+0Sg: nimiijisiiminaadog
     miijin+VTI+Ind+Neg+Dub+Incl+0Pl: gimiijisiiminaadogenan
     miijin+VTI+Ind+Neg+Dub+Incl+0Sg: gimiijisiiminaadog
     miijin+VTI+Ind+Neg+Dub+X+0Pl: MISSING
     miijin+VTI+Ind+Neg+Dub+X+0Sg: MISSING
     miijin+VTI+Ind+Pos+Dub+1Sg+0Pl: nimiijinaadogenan
     miijin+VTI+Ind+Pos+Dub+1Sg+0Sg: nimiijinaadog
     miijin+VTI+Ind+Pos+Dub+2Pl+0Pl: gimiijinaawaadogenan
     miijin+VTI+Ind+Pos+Dub+2Pl+0Sg: gimiijinaawaadog
     miijin+VTI+Ind+Pos+Dub+2Sg+0Pl: gimiijinaadogenan
     miijin+VTI+Ind+Pos+Dub+2Sg+0Sg: gimiijinaadog
     miijin+VTI+Ind+Pos+Dub+3PlProx+0Pl: omiijinaawaadogenan
     miijin+VTI+Ind+Pos+Dub+3PlProx+0Sg: omiijinaawaadog
     miijin+VTI+Ind+Pos+Dub+3SgObv/3PlObv+0Pl: omiijininaadogenan
     miijin+VTI+Ind+Pos+Dub+3SgObv/3PlObv+0Sg: omiijininaadog
     miijin+VTI+Ind+Pos+Dub+3SgProx+0Pl: omiijinaadogenan
     miijin+VTI+Ind+Pos+Dub+3SgProx+0Sg: omiijinaadog
     miijin+VTI+Ind+Pos+Dub+Excl+0Pl: nimiijiminaadogenan
     miijin+VTI+Ind+Pos+Dub+Excl+0Sg: nimiijiminaadog
     miijin+VTI+Ind+Pos+Dub+Incl+0Pl: gimiijiminaadogenan
     miijin+VTI+Ind+Pos+Dub+Incl+0Sg: gimiijiminaadog
     miijin+VTI+Ind+Pos+Dub+X+0Pl: MISSING
     miijin+VTI+Ind+Pos+Dub+X+0Sg: MISSING
     miijin+VTI+Ind+Neg+DubPrt+1Sg+0Pl: MISSING
     miijin+VTI+Ind+Neg+DubPrt+1Sg+0Sg: MISSING
     miijin+VTI+Ind+Neg+DubPrt+2Pl+0Pl: MISSING
     miijin+VTI+Ind+Neg+DubPrt+2Pl+0Sg: MISSING
     miijin+VTI+Ind+Neg+DubPrt+2Sg+0Pl: MISSING
     miijin+VTI+Ind+Neg+DubPrt+2Sg+0Sg: MISSING
     miijin+VTI+Ind+Neg+DubPrt+3PlProx+0Pl: MISSING
     miijin+VTI+Ind+Neg+DubPrt+3PlProx+0Sg: MISSING
     miijin+VTI+Ind+Neg+DubPrt+3SgObv/3PlObv+0Pl: MISSING
     miijin+VTI+Ind+Neg+DubPrt+3SgObv/3PlObv+0Sg: MISSING
     miijin+VTI+Ind+Neg+DubPrt+3SgProx+0Pl: MISSING
     miijin+VTI+Ind+Neg+DubPrt+3SgProx+0Sg: MISSING
     miijin+VTI+Ind+Neg+DubPrt+Excl+0Pl: MISSING
     miijin+VTI+Ind+Neg+DubPrt+Excl+0Sg: MISSING
     miijin+VTI+Ind+Neg+DubPrt+Incl+0Pl: MISSING
     miijin+VTI+Ind+Neg+DubPrt+Incl+0Sg: MISSING
     miijin+VTI+Ind+Neg+DubPrt+X+0Pl: MISSING
     miijin+VTI+Ind+Neg+DubPrt+X+0Sg: MISSING
     miijin+VTI+Ind+Pos+DubPrt+1Sg+0Pl: MISSING
     miijin+VTI+Ind+Pos+DubPrt+1Sg+0Sg: MISSING
     miijin+VTI+Ind+Pos+DubPrt+2Pl+0Pl: MISSING
     miijin+VTI+Ind+Pos+DubPrt+2Pl+0Sg: MISSING
     miijin+VTI+Ind+Pos+DubPrt+2Sg+0Pl: MISSING
     miijin+VTI+Ind+Pos+DubPrt+2Sg+0Sg: MISSING
     miijin+VTI+Ind+Pos+DubPrt+3PlProx+0Pl: MISSING
     miijin+VTI+Ind+Pos+DubPrt+3PlProx+0Sg: MISSING
     miijin+VTI+Ind+Pos+DubPrt+3SgObv/3PlObv+0Pl: MISSING
     miijin+VTI+Ind+Pos+DubPrt+3SgObv/3PlObv+0Sg: MISSING
     miijin+VTI+Ind+Pos+DubPrt+3SgProx+0Pl: MISSING
     miijin+VTI+Ind+Pos+DubPrt+3SgProx+0Sg: MISSING
     miijin+VTI+Ind+Pos+DubPrt+Excl+0Pl: MISSING
     miijin+VTI+Ind+Pos+DubPrt+Excl+0Sg: MISSING
     miijin+VTI+Ind+Pos+DubPrt+Incl+0Pl: MISSING
     miijin+VTI+Ind+Pos+DubPrt+Incl+0Sg: MISSING
     miijin+VTI+Ind+Pos+DubPrt+X+0Pl: MISSING
     miijin+VTI+Ind+Pos+DubPrt+X+0Sg: MISSING
     miijin+VTI+Ind+Neg+Neu+1Sg+0Pl: nimiijisiinan
     miijin+VTI+Ind+Neg+Neu+1Sg+0Sg: nimiijisiin
     miijin+VTI+Ind+Neg+Neu+2Pl+0Pl: gimiijisiinaawaan
     miijin+VTI+Ind+Neg+Neu+2Pl+0Sg: gimiijisiinaawaa
     miijin+VTI+Ind+Neg+Neu+2Sg+0Pl: gimiijisiinan
     miijin+VTI+Ind+Neg+Neu+2Sg+0Sg: gimiijisiin
     miijin+VTI+Ind+Neg+Neu+3PlProx+0Pl: omiijisiinaawaan
     miijin+VTI+Ind+Neg+Neu+3PlProx+0Sg: omiijisiinaawaa
     miijin+VTI+Ind+Neg+Neu+3SgObv/3PlObv+0Pl: [omiijisiinini,omiijisiini]
     miijin+VTI+Ind+Neg+Neu+3SgObv/3PlObv+0Sg: [omiijisiinini,omiijisiini]
     miijin+VTI+Ind+Neg+Neu+3SgProx+0Pl: omiijisiinan
     miijin+VTI+Ind+Neg+Neu+3SgProx+0Sg: omiijisiin
     miijin+VTI+Ind+Neg+Neu+Excl+0Pl: nimiijisiimin
     miijin+VTI+Ind+Neg+Neu+Excl+0Sg: nimiijisiimin
     miijin+VTI+Ind+Neg+Neu+Incl+0Pl: gimiijisiimin
     miijin+VTI+Ind+Neg+Neu+Incl+0Sg: gimiijisiimin
     miijin+VTI+Ind+Neg+Neu+X+0Pl: MISSING
     miijin+VTI+Ind+Neg+Neu+X+0Sg: MISSING
     miijin+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0Pl: nimiijinan
     miijin+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0Sg: nimiijin
     miijin+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+2Pl+0Pl: gimiijinaawaan
     miijin+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+2Pl+0Sg: gimiijinaawaa
     miijin+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+2Sg+0Pl: gimiijinan
     miijin+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+2Sg+0Sg: gimiijin
     miijin+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3PlProx+0Pl: omiijinaawaan
     miijin+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3PlProx+0Sg: omiijinaawaa
     miijin+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3SgObv/3PlObv+0Pl: [omiijinini,omiijini]
     miijin+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3SgObv/3PlObv+0Sg: [omiijinini,omiijini]
     miijin+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3SgProx+0Pl: omiijinan
     miijin+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3SgProx+0Sg: omiijin
     miijin+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+Excl+0Pl: nimiijimin
     miijin+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+Excl+0Sg: nimiijimin
     miijin+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+Incl+0Pl: gimiijimin
     miijin+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+Incl+0Sg: gimiijimin
     miijin+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+X+0Pl: MISSING
     miijin+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+X+0Sg: MISSING
     miijin+VTI+Ind+Neg+Prt+1Sg+0Pl: [nimiijisiinaabaniin,nimiijisiinaabanen]
     miijin+VTI+Ind+Neg+Prt+1Sg+0Sg: nimiijisiinaaban
     miijin+VTI+Ind+Neg+Prt+2Pl+0Pl: [gimiijisiinaawaabaniin,gimiijisiinaawaabanen]
     miijin+VTI+Ind+Neg+Prt+2Pl+0Sg: gimiijisiinaawaaban
     miijin+VTI+Ind+Neg+Prt+2Sg+0Pl: [gimiijisiinaabaniin,gimiijisiinaabanen]
     miijin+VTI+Ind+Neg+Prt+2Sg+0Sg: gimiijisiinaaban
     miijin+VTI+Ind+Neg+Prt+3PlProx+0Pl: [omiijisiinaawaabaniin,omiijisiinaawaabanen]
     miijin+VTI+Ind+Neg+Prt+3PlProx+0Sg: omiijisiinaawaaban
     miijin+VTI+Ind+Neg+Prt+3SgObv/3PlObv+0Pl: [omiijisiininaabaniin,omiijisiininaabanen]
     miijin+VTI+Ind+Neg+Prt+3SgObv/3PlObv+0Sg: omiijisiininaaban
     miijin+VTI+Ind+Neg+Prt+3SgProx+0Pl: [omiijisiinaabaniin,omiijisiinaabanen]
     miijin+VTI+Ind+Neg+Prt+3SgProx+0Sg: omiijisiinaaban
     miijin+VTI+Ind+Neg+Prt+Excl+0Pl: [nimiijisiiminaabaniin,nimiijisiiminaabanen]
     miijin+VTI+Ind+Neg+Prt+Excl+0Sg: nimiijisiiminaaban
     miijin+VTI+Ind+Neg+Prt+Incl+0Pl: [gimiijisiiminaabaniin,gimiijisiiminaabanen]
     miijin+VTI+Ind+Neg+Prt+Incl+0Sg: gimiijisiiminaaban
     miijin+VTI+Ind+Neg+Prt+X+0Pl: MISSING
     miijin+VTI+Ind+Neg+Prt+X+0Sg: MISSING
     miijin+VTI+Ind+Pos+Prt+1Sg+0Pl: [nimiijinaabaniin,nimiijinaabanen]
     miijin+VTI+Ind+Pos+Prt+1Sg+0Sg: nimiijinaaban
     miijin+VTI+Ind+Pos+Prt+2Pl+0Pl: [gimiijinaawaabaniin,gimiijinaawaabanen]
     miijin+VTI+Ind+Pos+Prt+2Pl+0Sg: gimiijinaawaaban
